Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Cervids

257.550.
Kentucky Cervid CWD Surveillance and Identification Program.

There shall be a ban on the importation of live members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth that have not been subject to a program of surveillance and identification for cervid chronic wasting disease (CWD) that meets or exceeds:

The requirements of the Kentucky Cervid CWD Surveillance and Identification (CCWDSI) Program set forth in this section and in administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture; and

Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.

The Kentucky Department of Agriculture shall be responsible for authorizing importation of the members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth that have been subject to a program of surveillance and identification for cervid CWD that meets or exceeds:

The requirements of the Kentucky CCWDSI Program set forth in this section and in administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture; and

Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.

Members of the animal family Cervidae shall not be eligible for importation into the Commonwealth unless the program of surveillance and identification for cervid CWD to which they have been subject:

Has been certified by the exporting state’s state veterinarian or agency having jurisdiction over that state’s surveillance and identification program;

Has been approved by the Kentucky state veterinarian as meeting or exceeding the standards imposed under the Kentucky CCWDSI Program; and

Meets, at a minimum, the following requirements:

The program shall require cervid owners to obtain identification and laboratory diagnosis from brain tissue as directed by the exporting state’s state veterinarian or agency with jurisdiction for cervids twelve (12) months of age or greater that:

Display clinical signs of CWD;

Die, including deaths by slaughter or by hunting, including hunting on hunting preserves; or

Are ill or injured, regardless of whether the illness or injury results in death; and

The program shall require cervid owners to obtain cervids from herds that have been monitored for at least five (5) years and that have complied with the standards contained in the Kentucky CCWDSI Program.

Cervids originating from a state that has reported a confirmed case of CWD in wild or captive cervids shall not be imported into Kentucky until the United States Department of Agriculture approves:

Regulations that allow importation from states with confirmed cases of CWD; and

A live test for CWD that is available for live testing of cervids.

Importation of members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth shall be consistent with this section and with administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture in cooperation with the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 62, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

257.552.
Cervid holder in violation of state law or administrative regulation — Compliance timeframe — Quarantine.

If any person holding captive cervids regulated under KRS

150.725

to

150.735

is determined in violation of a Kentucky statute or administrative regulation pertaining to the health requirements, eradication of diseases, importation, and identification of those cervids, then that person shall have sixty (60) days from when the violation was identified to come into compliance. During the sixty (60) day period, the cervids shall be subject to quarantine by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture. The permit holder may request an administrative hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B within thirty (30) days of the notice of violation and may appeal the final decision to Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If a final determination upholds the Kentucky Department of Agriculture, the permit holder’s cervids may be disposed of by the department without compensation to the owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 62, § 7, effective June 25, 2009.